Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.09, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Modification. The commission shall meet as necessary for the purpose of modifying and improving the guidelines. Any modification which amends the Sentencing Guidelines grid, including severity levels and criminal history scores, or which would result in the reduction of any sentence or in the early release of any inmate, with the exception of a modification mandated or authorized by the legislature or relating to a crime created or amended by the legislature in the preceding session, shall be submitted to the legislature by January 15 of any year in which the commission wishes to make the change and shall be effective on August 1 of that yeardeleted text begin , unlessdeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end the legislature by law deleted text begin provides otherwisedeleted text end new text begin adopts or amends the modificationnew text end . All other modifications shall take effect according to the procedural rules of the commission. On or before January 15 of each year, the commission shall submit a written report to the committees of the senate and the house of representatives with jurisdiction over criminal justice policy that new text begin describes the commission's activities over the previous year and new text end identifies and explains all modifications made during the preceding 12 months and all proposed modifications that are being submitted to the legislature that year.